Hawaii statutes.
§805-3 Summons in what cases. Where,
from the complaint, it appears to the district judge that the offense charged
therein is not of a serious nature, or not one for which a severe penalty
should be imposed, and where the person complained against is so situated as to
raise no presumption of the person's attempting to elude justice in the
premises, the district judge may, in the district judge's discretion (unless
the complainant in writing requests the immediate arrest of the alleged
offender), issue the district judge's summons, wherein shall be recited the
substance of the complaint, commanding the alleged offender to appear before
the district judge upon a time to be therein stated, not less than twenty-four
hours from the time of service of summons, and then and there to answer the
charge. The summons shall contain a warning to the person summoned that
failure to obey the same will render the person liable to attachment for
contempt. [L 1892, c 57, §19; RL 1925, §4008; RL 1935, §5471; RL 1945, §10771;
RL 1955, §257-3; HRS §710-3; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Procedure against corporations, see §805-9.

Rules of Court

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next